Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.086

Waiver of reporting, accounting, and recordkeeping requirements prohibited.

Except where specifically provided in this chapter, the reporting, accounting, and recordkeeping requirements of this chapter, being matters of public interest, may not be waived by contract between the consignor and/or the commission merchant or dealer.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 304 s 5; 1974 ex.s. c 102 s 8.]